test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-svaqrrw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - svaʼrrõ: # Verb 52 'eng /est kaaluda/fin' - full paradigm
     svaʼrrõ+V+Inf: [svaʼrrõ, svarrõ]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Ger: [svaʼrrõs, svarrõs]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Sup: [svaʼrrõm, svarrõm]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Sup+Ine: [svaʼrrõmõs, svarrõmõs]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Sup+Ela: [svaʼrrõmõst, svarrõmõst]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Sup+Tra: [svaʼrrõmõks, svarrõmõks]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Sup+Abe: [svaʼrrõmõt, svarrõmõt]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [svaʼrrõb, svarrõb]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [svaʼrrõt, svarrõt]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [svaʼrrõbõd, svarrõbõd]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [svaʼrriz, svarriz]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [[svaʼrr izt, svaʼrr, iztõ], [svarr izt, svaʼrr, iztõ]]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [[svaʼrr izt, svaʼrr, iztõ], [svarr izt, svaʼrr, iztõ]]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [svaʼr, svar]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [svaʼrrõks, svarrõks]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [svaʼr, svar]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [svaʼr, svar]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [svaʼrrõgid, svarrõgid]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [svaʼrrõg, svarrõg]
     svaʼrrõ+V+Quo+Sg3: [svaʼrriji, svarriji]
     svaʼrrõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [svaʼrrõn, svarrõn]
     svaʼrrõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [svaʼrdõd, svardõd]
